src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in the Romany language are numbers.

LEXICON Numerals
Arabic ;
Numbers ;

LEXICON Arabic
1 # ; ! shall be common files

LEXICON Numbers
1to10 ;
11to19 ;


LEXICON 11to19
deȟo 1to10 ;


LEXICON 1to10
iek NUMCASE ;
dui  NUMCASE ;
triin  NUMCASE ;
staar NUMCASE ;
pangȟ NUMCASE ;
ȟou  NUMCASE ;
efta NUMCASE ;
oȟta NUMCASE ;
enja NUMCASE ;
deȟ  NUMCASE ;


LEXICON NUMCASE
+Num: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
